Utah statutes.
75-3-704.   Personal representative to proceed without court order -- Exception.

A personal representative shall proceed expeditiously with the settlement and distribution of a decedent's estate and except as otherwise specified or ordered in regard to a supervised personal representative, do so without adjudication, order, or direction of the court, but may invoke the jurisdiction of the court in proceedings authorized by this code to resolve questions concerning the estate or its administration.



Amended by Chapter 110, 1988 General Session

